District of Columbia statutes.
10-1221.13

Information reporting.

Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the issuance of the bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the Council.

Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 113, 53 DCR 5430
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 113 of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).